Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 456.515 to
456.725.
SECTION 2. On or before September 15 of  each year, the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department shall provide a report to an appropriate interim committee of the Legis-
lative Assembly  in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 that includes, of the dwelling units
that the  department provided loans, grants or other funding awards to, the number and
percentage that include accessibility features of  an accessibility category recognized under
a state building code established under ORS 455.030, disaggregated by category.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 456.515 is amended to read:
456.515. As used in ORS 456.515 to 456.725 and ORS chapter 458 unless the  context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Accessible unit” means a dwelling unit designed and constructed  for accessibility as
defined by the Housing and Community Services Department by  rule in consultation with the
Department of Consumer and Business Services.
[(1)] (2)  “Community Action Partnership of Oregon” means an organization described in ORS
458.505.
[(2)] (3)  “Construction” includes, but is not limited to, new construction  or moderate or sub-
stantial rehabilitation of existing structures or facilities.
[(3)] (4) “Council” means the Oregon Housing Stability Council established under ORS 456.567.
[(4)] (5)  “Department” means the Housing and Community Services Department  established un-
der ORS 456.555.
[(5)] (6) “Director” means the Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
[(6)] (7)  “Elderly household” means  a household whose head is over the age of 55, residing in
this state.
[(7)] (8) “Major life activity” includes but is not limited to self-care, ambulation,  communication,
transportation, education, socialization, employment and  ability to acquire, rent or maintain prop-
erty.
[(8)(a)] (9)(a)  “Multifamily housing”  means a structure or facility established primarily to pro-
vide housing that provides more  than one living unit, and may also provide facilities that are func-
Enrolled House Bill 3309 (HB 3309-B) Page 1
tionally related and subordinate  to the living units for use by the occupants in social, health,
educational or recreational activities:
(A) For the elderly, including but  not limited to individual living units within such structures,
mobile home and manufactured dwelling parks and residential facilities licensed under ORS  443.400
to 443.455 and other congregate care facilities with or without domiciliary care.
(B) For persons with disabilities,  including, but not limited to, individual living units within such
structures, mobile home and manufactured  dwelling parks and residential facilities licensed under
ORS 443.400 to 443.455 and other congregate care facilities with or without domiciliary care.
(b) “Multifamily housing” does not include nursing homes, hospitals, places  primarily engaged
in recreational activities and single-family, detached  dwellings, except manufactured dwellings situ-
ated in a mobile home and manufactured dwelling park.
[(9)] (10) “Person with a  disability” means a person who has a physical or mental impairment
that substantially limits one or more major life activities.
[(10)] (11) “Target population” means:
(a) Elderly households; or
(b) Persons with disabilities.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 456.555, as amended  by section 3, chapter 193, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 892), is amended to read:
456.555. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department is established.
(2) The department is supervised and controlled by  a director who is responsible for the per-
formance of the duties imposed upon the  department. The Governor shall appoint the Director of the
Housing and Community Services Department. The director shall hold office at the  pleasure of the
Governor. The person  appointed as director must be a person who, by training and experience, is
well qualified to perform the duties of the office.
(3) The director shall receive such salary as  may be provided by law, or, if not so provided, as
may be fixed by the Governor. In addition to the salary of  the director, the director shall, subject
to the limitations otherwise provided by  law, be reimbursed for all expenses actually and necessarily
incurred by the director in the performance of official duties.
(4) The  director may establish department divisions including but not limited to divisions for
administration, housing programs and community services programs.
(5) The department shall consider advice on housing and community service programs from:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations; [ and]
(k) Persons with disabilities and disability services or advocacy organizations; and
[(k)] (L)  Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(6) The director shall report regularly to the Oregon  Housing Stability Council to keep the
council informed on progress made by the  department in carrying out the department’s responsibil-
ities for housing programs.
(7) The department shall administer federal programs.  Federal funds for housing stabilization
must, to the  extent consistent with federal law, be allocated statewide in a manner proportionate
to a needs-based and geographically based formula.
(8) The department may adopt rules to carry out the programs that the department is charged
with administering, including, but not limited to, rules regarding:
(a) Administration and enforcement.
Enrolled House Bill 3309 (HB 3309-B) Page 2
(b) Criteria for the granting of benefits.
(c) The establishment of fees and charges.
(d) The identification of housing programs and community services programs.
(e) The distinguishing of housing programs from community services programs.
(9) When a statute authorizes or requires that the department or the director adopt  rules or
policies or administer programs, the director may, at any stage in  the process, consult with or seek
the approval of the council.
(10) The department shall establish by rule  one or more threshold property purchase prices
above which a housing loan proposed by the department requires  council review and approval under
ORS 456.561. In establishing or modifying a threshold property  purchase price under this subsection,
the department shall consider any  maximum acquisition cost set forth in the Internal Revenue Code
or federal rules and regulations implementing the code.
(11) The department shall establish by rule one or more  threshold amounts above which a
housing grant or other housing funding award proposal requires council review and  approval under
ORS 456.561.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 456.571, as amended by section 5, chapter  193, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 892), is amended to read:
456.571. (1) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall, with the advice of the Director  of the
Housing and Community Services Department, develop policies to:
(a) Aid in stimulating  and increasing the supply of housing for persons and families of lower
income;
(b) Address geographic and racial disparities; and
(c) Ensure funds distributed by the  Housing and Community Services Department contribute to
addressing other state priorities.
(2) The council shall make special effort to  respond to both private and public actions that may
raise the cost of the housing supply in the open market, as the open  market is the source of housing
for the preponderance of lower income households.
(3) The council is responsible  for studying and commenting upon, and advising the department,
Governor, Legislative Assembly,  other state agencies and local governments concerning, local, state
and federal legislation or rules that affect the cost and supply of  housing, both before and after the
legislation and rules are enacted. For purposes of this subsection, “legislation or rules  that affect
the cost and supply of housing” includes but is not limited to legislation or rules that would:
(a) Provide financing for the construction or rehabilitation of housing;
(b) Subsidize new or existing housing costs for lower income households  by income support, tax
credit, or support service methods;
(c) Regulate the division of land;
(d) Regulate the use of land;
(e) Regulate building construction standards;
(f) Regulate fees and charges for  inspection services, permits, or professional services related
to housing;
(g) Encourage alternatives that increase housing choices;
(h) Encourage alternatives that increase the quantity and quality of accessible units;
[(h)] (i) Create or avert overlapping jurisdictional functions and  the concomitant increased costs
that are reflected in housing prices;
[(i)] (j)  Create or avoid conflicting state  and federal regulations that deprive lower income
households of assistance; and
[(j)] (k) Help or hinder compliance with the housing goals established by the Land Conservation
and Development Commission under ORS 197.240.
(4) The council, with the approval  of the Governor, may initiate legal proceedings in the name
of the council to further the council’s purposes under this section.
(5) The  council shall exercise the responsibilities and powers of the council in a manner that
expedites the acquisition, construction, improvement or rehabilitation of housing.
Enrolled House Bill 3309 (HB 3309-B) Page 3
(6) With respect to the Community Development Incentive Project  Fund established under ORS
458.720, the council shall  develop program guidelines, including specific project criteria and financ-
ing mechanisms, review applications seeking funding from the fund and make recommendations for
funding approval to the director and review proposals for cooperative agreements  or joint projects
between the department and other state agencies to facilitate the goals of the fund.
(7) The council  shall advise and assist the department, at the director’s request, with rules,
policies and programs under ORS 456.555 (9). In providing advice and assistance,  the council shall
consider advice on housing and community service programs from entities  listed under ORS 456.555
(5) and other entities identified by the department by rule.
(8) The council shall approve or  disapprove loans, grants and other funding award proposals
under ORS 456.561.
(9) The council shall incorporate incentives  designed to increase the quantity and quality
of accessible units wherever possible in housing development funding offerings.
[(9)] (10) The council, in conjunction  with the Community Action Partnership of Oregon, shall
ensure the coordination of state agency homelessness relief efforts.
SECTION 6.
The Housing and Community Services Department shall provide the first
report under section 2 of this 2023 Act no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 14, 2023
Repassed by House June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3309 (HB 3309-B) Page 4